Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.165

Investigations.

For the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or securing information lawfully required under this chapter, the office of the attorney general may at any time: Investigate the debt adjusting business and examine the books, accounts, records, and files used; have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, records, files, safes, and vaults of debt adjusters; and require the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whomsoever whose testimony might be required relative to such debt adjusting business or to the subject matter of any examination, investigation, or hearing.

[ 1999 c 151 s 110; 1979 c 156 s 7.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 156: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.